Arkansas, session 2025, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Public Safety for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC013 SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY 1 GRADE SE05
(2) D145C DPS CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE02
(3) D103C DPS CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT11
(4) D003C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR LEAD 1 GRADE IT09
(5) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT08
(6) D123C DB ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT08
*DJC008*
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(7) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(8) D035C COMPUTER SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT07
(9) D034C DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(10) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 4 GRADE IT07
(11) D017C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(12) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT06
(13) D025C STATE IT SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(14) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(15) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 4 GRADE IT05
(16) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(17) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(18) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 7 GRADE IT03
(19) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE IT02
(20) D089C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ASSISTANT 5 GRADE IT01
(21) A139C CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(22) G316C DPS GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(23) G031N ASP GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(24) B150C DPS RESEARCH AND PLANNING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(25) P002N ADH DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS13
(26) A140C DPS CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(27) A011N DPS FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(28) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(29) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 2 GRADE GS11
(30) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS11
(31) E079C DPS SPECIAL PROJECTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(32) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(33) G156C DPS PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(34) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(35) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(36) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(37) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(38) C113C DPS EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS08
(39) B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST 1 GRADE GS08
(40) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(41) V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(42) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(43) B052C FORENSIC SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(44) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(45) R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(46) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(47) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(48) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(49) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 6 GRADE GS05
(50) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 3 GRADE GS05
(51) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(52) A101C ACCOUNTING TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(53) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(54) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS04
(55) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 97

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Public Safety - Shared Services for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Public
Safety - Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $5,898,936
(02) EXTRA HELP 55,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,103,711
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(04) OVERTIME 10,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 810,629
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 35,500
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,913,776

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS PROGRAM. There
is hereby established for the Department of Public Safety - Crime Victims
Reparations Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N229N DPS CRIME VICTIM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(2) X220C CVRB SENIOR ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS07
(3) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 8

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS PROGRAM. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Public Safety - Crime Victims
Reparations Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS PROGRAM - STATE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services,
operating expenses and payment of claims by the Department of Public Safety -
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
Crime Victims Reparations Program - State for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CRIME VICTIMS REPARATION PROGRAM $2,182,659

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund, for operating expenses and
payment of claims by the Department of Public Safety - Crime Victims
Reparations Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $37,419
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,100
(C) PROF. FEES 1,545
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CLAIMS 634,464
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $674,528

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS BOARD - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses and payment of claims by the Department of
Public Safety - Crime Victims Reparations Board - Federal for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CLAIMS 1,805,404
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,855,404

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC SAFETY EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Public Safety Equipment Grant Program Fund, for equipment,
training, accreditation, and associated expenditures of the Department of
Public Safety - Public Safety Equipment Grant Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PUBLIC SAFETY EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM $5,000,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety -
Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $171,228
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 65,409
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 840,100
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 128,400
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,452,400
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,657,537

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS - SEXUAL ASSAULT KIT
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
INITIATIVE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public
Safety, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Public Safety - Federal Operations - Sexual Assault Kit
Initiative for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $166,200
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 60,714
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 491,771
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 14,066
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 124,335
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $857,086

SECTION 12. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS STATE POLICE. There is hereby
established for the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State
Police for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U064U DIRECTOR STATE POLICE 1 GRADE SE04
(2) N057N ASP DEPUTY DIRECTOR/LT. COLONEL 2 GRADE SE02
(3) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(4) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE IT03
(5) T001C ASP MAJOR 6 GRADE GS14
(6) T003C ASP CAPTAIN 21 GRADE GS13
(7) T007C ASP LIEUTENANT 27 GRADE GS12
(8) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(9) T011C ASP SERGEANT 85 GRADE GS11
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(10) T009C ASP SPECIAL OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS11
(11) X011C ASP/CACD INVESTIGATOR ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(12) E079C DPS SPECIAL PROJECTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(13) C002C HIGHWAY SAFETY OFFICE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(14) P067C ASP PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE GS10
(15) T024C ASP/CACD HOTLINE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(16) G156C DPS PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(17) C109C ASP CACD AREA MANAGER 11 GRADE GS09
(18) T022C ASP CORPORAL 531 GRADE GS09
(19) S005C AVIATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(20) R019C BUDGET MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(21) C110C DPS FLEET ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE GS09
(22) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(23) G086C DPS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(24) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(25) M018C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR II 1 GRADE GS08
(26) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(27) X108C ASP DL/CDL COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(28) X090C ASP/CACD SENIOR INVESTIGATOR 73 GRADE GS07
(29) S115C AUTO BODY REPAIR TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS07
(30) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(31) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(32) T044C IA SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(33) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(34) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(35) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS07
(36) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 12 GRADE GS06
(37) X219C ASP DRIVER LICENSE EXAMINER SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(38) T046C ASP/CACD HOTLINE SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS06
(39) S020C AVIATION TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS06
(40) S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 3 GRADE GS06
(41) G191C HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(42) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(43) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(44) T061C SENIOR IA 4 GRADE GS06
(45) D074C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR 13 GRADE GS06
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(46) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(47) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 23 GRADE GS05
(48) D081C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST 71 GRADE GS05
(49) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 8 GRADE GS04
(50) X189C AFIS TECHNICIAN 8 GRADE GS04
(51) T102C ASP CACD SR. HOTLINE OPERATOR 35 GRADE GS04
(52) X179C ASP COMMERCIAL DRIVER LICENSE EXAMINER 19 GRADE GS04
(53) X182C ASP DRIVERS LICENSE EXAMINER 39 GRADE GS04
(54) X160C ASP USED MOTOR VEHICLE INSPECTOR 8 GRADE GS04
(55) S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC 1 GRADE GS04
(56) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(57) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(58) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS04
(59) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 21 GRADE GS03
(60) X161C ASP INVESTIGATOR SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS03
(61) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 10 GRADE GS02
(62) C080C CREDENTIALING ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS02
(63) X178C FINGERPRINT TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,096

SECTION 13. EXTRA HELP - ASP. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: twenty (20) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - ASP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Division of Arkansas State Police Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State
Police - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $64,216,141
(02) EXTRA HELP 238,835
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 39,214,284
(04) OVERTIME 3,861,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,798,588
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 276,325
(C) PROF. FEES 189,527
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) UNIFORMS 640,000
(07) COVERT OPERATIONS 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $124,559,700

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - ASP - VARIOUS FEDERAL PROGRAMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas
State Police - Various Federal Programs for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $570,330
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 212,596
(C) PROF. FEES 6,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 249,982
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,038,908

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - ASP - AUTOMATED FINGERPRINT IDENTIFICATION
SYSTEM (AFIS). There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public
Safety, to be payable from the State Police Equipment Fund, for operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
Police - AFIS for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,666,650
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,400
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,725,050

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - ASP - CONFISCATED FUNDS TRANSFER. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Court Awards Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police - Confiscated
Funds Transfer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING $71,160
(02) OVERTIME 110,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 279,930
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 80,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $691,090

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ASP - CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the State Police Equipment Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police -
Criminal Background Checks for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $409,825
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 299,694
(03) OVERTIME 1,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,784,412
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,700
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,703,631

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - ASP - HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund, for personal
services, operating expenses and Highway Safety Program Grants of the
Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police - Highway
Safety Program - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $652,907
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 657,377
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) HIGHWAY SAFETY GRANTS 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,530,284

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - ASP - HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM - STATE.
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Arkansas Child Passenger Protection Fund, for operating
expenses and Highway Safety Program Grants of the Department of Public Safety
- Division of Arkansas State Police - Highway Safety Program - State for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $80,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM GRANTS 123,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $203,000

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - ASP - HOMELAND SECURITY - FEDERAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be transferred
from the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund, and to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas
State Police - Homeland Security - Federal for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $255,370
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 197,966
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 265,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $718,336

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - ASP - TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT. There is
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the State Police Equipment Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police -
Training and Equipment for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $390,080
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 191,017
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,831,097

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - ASP - OPERATIONS - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Public
Safety - Division of Arkansas State Police - Operations - Cash for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $100,000

SECTION 24. REGULAR SALARIES - CLEST. There is hereby established for
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
the Department of Public Safety - Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement
Standards and Training for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N252N CLEST DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) T128C CLEST DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS13
(3) T025C CLEST SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS10
(4) T029C CLEST SENIOR AGENT 20 GRADE GS09
(5) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(6) T100C ASP TROOPER 1 GRADE GS07
(7) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(8) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(9) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 5 GRADE GS04
(10) S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC 1 GRADE GS04
(11) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(12) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 6 GRADE GS03
(13) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS03
(14) T084C PUBLIC SAFETY SECURITY OFFICER 5 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 53

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,492,899
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 948,626
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,054,870
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 14,700
(C) PROF. FEES 5,699
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ADVANCED LAW ENFORCEMENT RAPID
RESPONSE TRAINING (ALERRT) $100,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,616,794

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - SPECIAL TRAINING - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of
Public Safety - CLEST - Special Training - Cash for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $50,000

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - 911 TRAINING & EDUCATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - 911 Training &
Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $141,013
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 52,335
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 189,099
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $388,447

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - FALLEN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Fallen Law Enforcement Officers' Beneficiary Fund, for
personal services, operating expenses and grants of the Department of Public
Safety - CLEST - Fallen Law Enforcement Officers for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FALLEN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS $50,000

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - LAW ENFORCEMENT FAMILY RELIEF TRUST
FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to
be payable from the Law Enforcement Family Relief Trust Fund, for
miscellaneous grants awarded by the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Law
Enforcement Family Relief Trust Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LAW ENFORCEMENT FAMILY RELIEF GRANTS $500,000

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Law Enforcement Training Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Law
Enforcement Training Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING PROGRAM
EXPENSES $160,000

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - CASH OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Public
Safety - CLEST - Cash Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PUBLIC SAFETY EQUIPMENT GRANT $100,000

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses and costs associated with the
Advanced Law Enforcement Rapid Response Training Program of the Department of
Public Safety - CLEST - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) TRANSFER - ALERRT $145,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses and costs associated with the Crisis Intervention Program
of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Federal for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FEDERAL AWARD $100,000

SECTION 34. REGULAR SALARIES - CLEST - LAW ENFORCEMENT SAFETY OFFICE.
There is hereby established for the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Law
Enforcement Safety Office for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G301C DPS LESO PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - LAW ENFORCEMENT SAFETY OFFICE -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to
be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the
Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Law Enforcement Safety Office - Cash
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LAW ENFORCEMENT SAFETY OFFICE - CASH $40,000

SECTION 36. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - LAW ENFORCEMENT SAFETY OFFICE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Law
Enforcement Safety Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $70,179
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 24,040
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 100
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $94,319

SECTION 37. REGULAR SALARIES - CLEST - CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITY
REVIEW. There is hereby established for the Department of Public Safety -
CLEST - Criminal Detention Facility Review for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X026C CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITIES COORD 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 38. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITY REVIEW.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Criminal
Detention Facility Review for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $110,113
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 41,133
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 19,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,500
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $171,746

SECTION 39. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - CRIMINAL DETENTION COMMITTEE
EXPENSES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety,
to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Criminal Detention
Committee Expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $18,639
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $18,639

SECTION 40. APPROPRIATION - CLEST - TRANSPORTATION OF JUVENILE
OFFENDERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety,
to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for miscellaneous
grants and aid of the Department of Public Safety - CLEST - Transportation of
Juvenile Offenders for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID - TRANSPORTATION OF
JUVENILE OFFENDERS $187,000

SECTION 41. REGULAR SALARIES - ACIC. There is hereby established for
the Department of Public Safety - Arkansas Crime Information Center for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U069U ACIC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) G052C DPS DIVISION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(3) G158C ACIC PROGRAM MANAGER 6 GRADE GS07
(4) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(5) D073C ACIC FIELD AGENT 8 GRADE GS06
(6) G192C ACIC PROGRAM ANALYST 8 GRADE GS06
(7) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(8) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(9) X189C AFIS TECHNICIAN 4 GRADE GS04
(10) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 21 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 55

SECTION 42. EXTRA HELP - ACIC. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Public Safety - Arkansas Crime Information Center for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 43. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Crime Information System Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Department of Public Safety - ACIC - Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,481,933
(02) EXTRA HELP 23,369
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,041,913
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,960,506
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 38,250
(C) PROF. FEES 11,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,556,971

SECTION 44. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - SYSTEMS CONFERENCE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Public
Safety - ACIC - Systems Conference for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $100,000

SECTION 45. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - SEX/CHILD OFFENDER REGISTRATION
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety,
to be payable from the Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund, for
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - ACIC - Sex/Child
Offender Registration Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SOR TRANSFERS $60,000

04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
SECTION 46. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - SCRAP METAL LOGBOOK. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Crime Information System Fund, for operating expenses of the Department
of Public Safety - ACIC - Scrap Metal Logbook for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SCRAP METAL LOGBOOK/CATALYTIC
CONVERTER PROGRAM $190,000

SECTION 47. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - ACIC - Federal
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $297,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,164
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,400,164

SECTION 48. APPROPRIATION - ACIC - NCHIP. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the National Criminal History Improvement Program of
the Department of Public Safety - ACIC - NCHIP for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $35,438
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 11,104
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 776,656
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $823,198

SECTION 49. REGULAR SALARIES - CRIME LAB. There is hereby established
for the Department of Public Safety - Arkansas Crime Lab for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U094U CRIME LAB EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L001N CRIME LAB DIR MEDICAL EXAMINATION DIV 1 GRADE MP10
(3) L004N CRIME LAB ASSOC MEDICAL EXAMINER 8 GRADE MP09
(4) U093U CRIME LAB ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(5) B019C FORENSIC ADMINISTRATOR 15 GRADE GS11
(6) B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST 90 GRADE GS08
(7) B137C CRIME LAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(8) B073C FORENSIC TECHNICIAN SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(9) B094C FORENSIC TECHNICIAN 35 GRADE GS05
(10) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(11) B111C LABORATORY TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS04
(12) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(13) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 4 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 168

SECTION 50. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - STATE OPERATIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Crime Lab - State Operations
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $10,261,796
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,605,204
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,172,998
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 55,000
(C) PROF. FEES 66,515
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) STUDENT LOAN INCENTIVE PROGRAM
EXPENSES 75,000
(05) FELLOWSHIP PROGRAM EXPENSES 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,361,513

SECTION 51. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - DNA SECTION - SPECIAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable
from the DNA Detection Fund, for operating expenses of the Department of
Public Safety - Crime Lab - DNA Section - Special for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,433,520
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 33,750
(C) PROF. FEES 185,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,652,270

SECTION 52. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - EQUIPMENT - SPECIAL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Crime Lab Equipment Fund, for the purchase and replacement of crime lab
equipment and operations of the Department of Public Safety - Crime Lab -
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
Equipment - Special for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CRIME LAB EQUIP/PUR/REPLACE $587,023

SECTION 53. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety -
Crime Lab - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $633,274
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 239,457
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,719,902
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 500,228
(C) PROF. FEES 614,470
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 586,279
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,293,610

SECTION 54. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Public
Safety - Crime Lab - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $254,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $254,000

SECTION 55. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - RAPID DNA TECHNOLOGY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for Rapid DNA Technology operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Crime Lab - Rapid DNA
Technology for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RAPID DNA EXPENSES $1,386,572

SECTION 56. APPROPRIATION - CRIME LAB - RAPID ID JUMP START PACKAGE -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to
be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for Rapid ID Jump Start Package
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Crime Lab - Rapid ID Jump Start
Package - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RAPID ID JUMP START PACKAGE $369,460

SECTION 57. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ASP.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The Arkansas State Police is hereby authorized to purchase
from Maintenance & General Operations Classifications in the Operations
Appropriation provided by this Act, up to an amount not to exceed $2,500 each
fiscal year, promotional items, authorized by the Secretary of the Department
to meet requirements of the Arkansas State Police Strategic Recruitment Plan.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
SECTION 58. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ASP. MOTOR VEHICLE PURCHASE. The Arkansas State Police is hereby authorized
to purchase motor vehicles from the appropriations authorized for Capital
Outlay in the State Police Operations and/or Confiscated Funds Transfer
appropriation in this Act. Motor vehicles donated to Arkansas State Police
and confiscated vehicles used for Arkansas State Police operations shall not
be included in the maximum number of authorized passenger vehicles.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 59. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SHARED SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a
Shared Services paying account on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Public Safety.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 60. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SALARY GRID.
(a) In the event additional General Revenue funds become available to
the Department of Public Safety, as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, the division shall implement a salary administration grid
effective July 1, 2022, after review by Legislative Council or, if the
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(b) All employees in the certified law enforcement officer
classifications, including recruits, at the Department of Public Safety are
eligible for the increase provided in the salary administration grid
established in section (a); the grid increase shall be in addition to any
cost-of-living adjustment or performance-based increase provided during the
2023 Fiscal Year. Notwithstanding other provisions of law, salaries
established by this section may exceed the maximum pay level for the grade
assigned to the classification by no more than twenty percent (20%) for any
effected employee.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 61. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RECRUITMENT EXPENSES. The Department of Public Safety - Crime Lab is
authorized to pay for recruitment expenses of potential Medical Examiner
employees. During the recruitment phase of interviewing potential employees,
Crime Lab is authorized to pay for airfare, hotel, and meal expenses.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 62. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 63. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H4/3/25 HB1191
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 64. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee


















04-03-2025 16:25:06 DJC008